ServerSide/Hunspell/quh_BO/quh_BO.dic
achnikuy/V
ajllaparipuy/V
akakipaykukuy/V
allichachipuy/V
allwikapuy/V
anchayakapuy/V
anqosallay/V
apuchakapuy/V
arinlachikuy/V
arqhemuy/V
asnanpuy/V
atipakuy/V
awqanchanallay/V
aykurakapuy/V
aypurillay/V
ayñikamuy/V
ch'ajwachipuy/V
ch'allpachipuy/V
ch'aqllachikuy/V
ch'asachipuy/V
ch'ichichachiy/V
ch'illpillay/V
ch'iqellay/V
ch'isñillay/V
ch'ojminchakapuy/V
ch'ullakuy/V
ch'uqechakuy/V
ch'usniykukuy/V
ch'uyanchakanpuy/V
chajchachikuy/V
chajruykukuy/V
chamapayakanpuy/V
chankallpachimuy/V
chapatiyanpuy/V
chaqomuy/V
chawpinchamuy/V
chhajchakamuy/V
chhallchachiy/V
chhankichikuy/V
chhapuykuy/V
chhichaykuy/V
chhullachikuy/V
chichillarichiy/V
chijllupayachimuy/V
chinpanpuy/V
chirapanakuy/V
chiwapuy/V
chuchulluyachiy/V
chullaykurichiy/V
chunkachay/V
churarayariy/V
gaywiripuy/V
ikhachipuy/V
intuchikuy/V
isillayakuy/V
itullay/V
jach'ukapuy/V
jallk'aykukuy/V
jamupayamuy/V
janaysiy/V
janllaykuy/V
janrayachimuy/V
jap'inrikuy/V
jaqepuy/V
jark'apuy/V
jatunyariy/V
jawiykukuy/V
jayllikapuy/V
jaytarakamuy/V
jañariy/V
jinch'achikuy/V
jipyaykuy/V
jojyaykukuy/V
jumint'akapuy/V
juntiyachimuy/V
juq'ochikanpuy/V
jusk'ullay/V
juypaykukuy/V
k'ajllachikuy/V
k'allmaysiy/V
k'anpanpuy/V
k'arupuy/V
k'atatataykuy/V
k'ikuy/V
k'intirichiy/V
k'irinchaykuy/V
k'iskiyallay/V
k'uchiykachapuy/V
k'umurayachimuy/V
k'unuysiy/V
k'utullay/V
kacharpayay/V
kallkikapuy/V
kamachaykukuy/V
kankaykukuy/V
karqenpariy/V
kawchuykukuy/V
khachupachipuy/V
khakurimuy/V
khamupachikapuy/V
khapaykachaysiy/V
khasaripuy/V
khichurikuy/V
khituy/V
khuskikachachikuy/V
khutuyakapuy/V
killaririy/V
kinchariy/V
kukupachimuy/V
kullunkarikuy/V
kururupuy/V
kuspiyapuy/V
kuywirimuy/V
lat'aykuy/V
llajsachipuy/V
llamiysiy/V
llanq'echikamuy/V
llapt'akanpuy/V
llaraykukuy/V
llawiriy/V
llijllakullay/V
llinp'achimuy/V
llipejyachiy/V
lliwichanakuy/V
llojumuy/V
llulluyakuy/V
llup'imuy/V
llust'illay/V
machakamuy/V
majllakapuy/V
makurkaysiy/V
mamukanpuy/V
mantarayallay/V
mararipuy/V
mat'irikuy/V
mayllirimuy/V
mich'umuy/V
millaychapuy/V
minikuy/V
mirakapuy/V
misk'incharichiy/V
miyurimuy/V
muchharikuy/V
mukiykukuy/V
mupuchallay/V
muruch'uchiy/V
musojyachipuy/V
mut'uchiy/V
muyuykukuy/V
naqeyarikuy/V
nunachakanpuy/V
p'achallikanpuy/V
p'akirichiy/V
p'anparaykuy/V
p'arwachipuy/V
p'enqachiy/V
p'inturichiy/V
p'ulltirichiy/V
p'uqariy/V
pakay/V
panikirimuy/V
paqomachimuy/V
parqoysiy/V
patachakiysiy/V
payurikamuy/V
phanchiykuy/V
phaskiykuy/V
phinkiykachakuy/V
phiñapayarichiy/V
phullchichimuy/V
phurunnachimuy/V
phutirayariy/V
pijchullay/V
pinchachakapuy/V
pirqarikuy/V
pitarimuy/V
pojturimuy/V
pukayarikuy/V
punkirakuy/V
puriykukuy/V
puñunakuy/V
q'allpamuy/V
q'apikuy/V
q'asukanpuy/V
q'eachakuy/V
q'ellpuchikuy/V
q'enqoriy/V
q'epnaysiy/V
q'ewarikamuy/V
q'olltirikuy/V
q'osñikanpuy/V
qachakuy/V
qallqakapuy/V
qanchiriy/V
qaranchakuy/V
qarwaysiy/V
qaychuykukuy/V
qelqachakamuy/V
qeqollay/V
qhajnariy/V
qhapannaripuy/V
qharastaykuy/V
qhasñuyakamuy/V
qhatukamuy/V
qhellichallay/V
qhespichanakuy/V
qhonay/V
qhorpikuriy/V
qollipayakapuy/V
qolqenchakuy/V
qontukamuy/V
qoriy/V
rachapay/V
rakhuyaykuy/V
ranpachimuy/V
raphiysiy/V
rat'annachikuy/V
rawraykuy/V
rijsirichiy/V
ririy/V
rojrillay/V
rumicharimuy/V
runkunakuy/V
rurallay/V
sajmarikuy/V
sallirikuy/V
sanay/V
sanq'ayachimuy/V
sapichanpuy/V
saqerichiy/V
saruykachariy/V
sawachikuy/V
sayakapuy/V
sich'uripuy/V
sijyaripuy/V
silluyaykukuy/V
sink'ukuy/V
sinqaykukuy/V
siq'echaykukuy/V
sisarichiy/V
suchumuy/V
sunk'ayariy/V
suruykukuy/V
suysunakuy/V
t'akaykachaysikuy/V
t'añunakuy/V
t'illqarimuy/V
t'ipsimuy/V
t'iumuy/V
t'unaripuy/V
t'usturikuy/V
takurimuy/V
tarparipuy/V
thallakapuy/V
thasnunakuy/V
thunkiysiy/V
tiariy/V
tijtirimuy/V
tojllaykukuy/V
tumparimuy/V
tutayapuy/V
ukhucharimuy/V
unachachimuy/V
uparichillay/V
urmaykachachimuy/V
uskhullukamuy/V
uwinakanpuy/V
uywichipuy/V
wakhakuy/V
wankarmanachimuy/V
wanurapuy/V
warawiyarichiy/V
wataqachiy/V
wayk'urikuy/V
waytanakuy/V
wijkharipuy/V
winaysiy/V
wisllallay/V
yachapayarikuy/V
yankichipuy/V
yarqharikuy/V
yupaycharichiy/V
ñanchapukapuy/V
ñañayaripuy/V
ñut'ullay/V
